test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_A_nika_gt-norm.yaml
     +Px1nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: ninikaenhimishiwaaibanag
     +Px1nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: ninikaenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: ninikaenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px1nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: ninikaenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: ninikaensimishinaanibaning
     +Px1nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: ninikaensimishinaanibanan
     +Px1nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: ninikaensimishinaanibanag
     +Px1nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: ninikaensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: ninikaensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px1nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: ninikaensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: ninikaensimishiniibaning
     +Px1nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: ninikaensimishiniibanan
     +Px1nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: ninikaensimishiniibanag
     +Px1nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: ninikaensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: ninikaensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px1nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: ninikaensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: ninikaensimishiwaaibaning
     +Px1nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: ninikaensimishiwaaibanan
     +Px1nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: ninikaensimishiwaaibanag
     +Px1nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: ninikaensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: ninikaensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px1nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: ninikaensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2nika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: ginikaenhimishinaanibaning
     +Px2nika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: ginikaenhimishinaanibanan
     +Px2nika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: ginikaenhimishinaanibanag
     +Px2nika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: ginikaenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2nika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: ginikaenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2nika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: ginikaenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: ginikaenhimishiniibaning
     +Px2nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: ginikaenhimishiniibanan
     +Px2nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: ginikaenhimishiniibanag
     +Px2nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: ginikaenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: ginikaenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: ginikaenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: ginikaenhimishiwaaibaning
     +Px2nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: ginikaenhimishiwaaibanan
     +Px2nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: ginikaenhimishiwaaibanag
     +Px2nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: ginikaenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: ginikaenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: ginikaenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: ginikaensimishinaanibaning
     +Px2nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: ginikaensimishinaanibanan
     +Px2nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: ginikaensimishinaanibanag
     +Px2nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: ginikaensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: ginikaensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: ginikaensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: ginikaensimishiniibaning
     +Px2nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: ginikaensimishiniibanan
     +Px2nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: ginikaensimishiniibanag
     +Px2nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: ginikaensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: ginikaensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: ginikaensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: ginikaensimishiwaaibaning
     +Px2nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: ginikaensimishiwaaibanan
     +Px2nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: ginikaensimishiwaaibanag
     +Px2nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: ginikaensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: ginikaensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: ginikaensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3nika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: onikaenhimishinaanibaning
     +Px3nika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: onikaenhimishinaanibanan
     +Px3nika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: onikaenhimishinaanibanag
     +Px3nika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: onikaenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3nika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: onikaenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3nika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: onikaenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: onikaenhimishiniibaning
     +Px3nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: onikaenhimishiniibanan
     +Px3nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: onikaenhimishiniibanag
     +Px3nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: onikaenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: onikaenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: onikaenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: onikaenhimishiwaaibaning
     +Px3nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: onikaenhimishiwaaibanan
     +Px3nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: onikaenhimishiwaaibanag
     +Px3nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: onikaenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: onikaenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: onikaenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: onikaensimishinaanibaning
     +Px3nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: onikaensimishinaanibanan
     +Px3nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: onikaensimishinaanibanag
     +Px3nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: onikaensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: onikaensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: onikaensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: onikaensimishiniibaning
     +Px3nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: onikaensimishiniibanan
     +Px3nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: onikaensimishiniibanag
     +Px3nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: onikaensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: onikaensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: onikaensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: onikaensimishiwaaibaning
     +Px3nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: onikaensimishiwaaibanan
     +Px3nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: onikaensimishiwaaibanag
     +Px3nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: onikaensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: onikaensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: onikaensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefnika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: inikaenhimishinaanibaning
     +PxIndefnika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: inikaenhimishinaanibanan
     +PxIndefnika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: inikaenhimishinaanibanag
     +PxIndefnika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: inikaenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefnika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: inikaenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefnika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: inikaenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefnika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: inikaenhimishiniibaning
     +PxIndefnika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: inikaenhimishiniibanan
     +PxIndefnika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: inikaenhimishiniibanag
     +PxIndefnika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: inikaenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefnika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: inikaenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefnika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: inikaenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefnika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: inikaenhimishiwaaibaning
     +PxIndefnika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: inikaenhimishiwaaibanan
     +PxIndefnika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: inikaenhimishiwaaibanag
     +PxIndefnika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: inikaenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefnika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: inikaenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefnika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: inikaenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefnika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: inikaensimishinaanibaning
     +PxIndefnika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: inikaensimishinaanibanan
     +PxIndefnika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: inikaensimishinaanibanag
     +PxIndefnika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: inikaensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefnika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: inikaensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefnika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: inikaensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefnika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: inikaensimishiniibaning
     +PxIndefnika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: inikaensimishiniibanan
     +PxIndefnika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: inikaensimishiniibanag
     +PxIndefnika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: inikaensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefnika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: inikaensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefnika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: inikaensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefnika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: inikaensimishiwaaibaning
     +PxIndefnika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: inikaensimishiwaaibanan
     +PxIndefnika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: inikaensimishiwaaibanag
     +PxIndefnika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: inikaensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefnika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: inikaensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefnika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: inikaensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     
